Utah statutes.
22-1-9.   Deposits in fiduciary's personal account.
If a fiduciary makes a deposit in a bank to his personal credit of checks
drawn by him upon an account in his own name as fiduciary, or of checks
payable to him as fiduciary, or of checks drawn by him upon an account in the
name of his principal, if he is empowered to draw checks thereon, or of checks
payable to his principal and indorsed by him, if he is empowered to indorse
such checks, or if he otherwise makes a deposit of funds held by him as
fiduciary, the bank receiving such deposit is not bound to inquire whether the
fiduciary is committing thereby a breach of his obligation as fiduciary; and
the bank is authorized to pay the amount of the deposit or any part thereof
upon the personal check of the fiduciary without being liable to the
principal, unless the bank receives the deposit or pays the check with actual
knowledge that the fiduciary is committing a breach of his obligation as
fiduciary in making such deposit or in drawing such check, or with knowledge
of such facts that its action in receiving the deposit or paying the check
amounts to bad faith.
